Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.575] EDUCATION ON RECOGNIZING PHYSICAL ABUSE IN INFANTS. new text end new text begin (a) All hospitals licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56 and birth centers licensed under section 144.615 must provide the parents of each newborn born at the hospital or birth center with written materials to educate parents on how to recognize the signs of physical abuse in infants and how to report suspected physical abuse of infants. Hospitals and birth centers must provide written materials obtained from or approved by the commissioner of health, and must provide these written materials to the newborn's parents before the newborn is discharged from the hospital or birth center after birth. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) develop and make available to hospitals, birth centers, and interested individuals, at cost, written materials for hospitals and birth centers to provide to parents of newborns according to paragraph (a); and new text end new text begin (2) review and approve or disapprove written materials submitted by hospitals and birth centers for provision to parents of newborns according to paragraph (a). new text end new text begin If the commissioner disapproves written materials submitted to the commissioner under this paragraph, the commissioner may suggest modifications to the written materials that, if made, would allow the commissioner to approve the written materials. new text end